Washington statutes.
RCW 18.11.190

Actions for compensation for services.

No action or suit may be instituted in any court of this state by any person, partnership, association, or corporation not licensed as an auctioneer and as an auction company to recover compensation for an act done or service rendered which is prohibited under this chapter.

[ 1986 c 324 s 15; 1982 c 205 s 17.]